Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 1. Hours of Operation

§ 12-5-101.
Hours of sale generally.

through (c) Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 50, § 2.

Local licensing authorities may set hours of operation for alcohol sales provided that the hours of operation are uniformly applied to establishments similarly situated.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 16; C.S. 1945, § 53-216; W.S. 1957, § 12-19; Laws 1965, ch. 21, § 1; 1967, ch. 165, § 1; 1973, ch. 116, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 12-2-121; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1979, ch. 156, § 2; 1996, ch. 122, § 2; 2017 ch. 50, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2017.

No equal protection violation. —

Although liquor licensees in the county had different Sunday operating hours from those imposed by the city for licensees within its boundaries, there was no equal protection violation because licensees of the county were not in the same class nor under the same circumstances and conditions as licensees of the city. WW Enters., Inc. v. City of Cheyenne, 956 P.2d 353,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1998).

Stated

in

Mickelson v. State, 886 P.2d 247,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1994).

The 2017 amendments. —

The first 2017 amendment, by ch. 50, §
1, effective July 1, 2017, added (d).

The second 2017 amendment, by ch. 50, §
2, deleted (a) through (c), concerning hours of sale, exceptions, and dates for unrestricted operation.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both are given effect as set out above.